src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/verb-parraIVae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/geasjmator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/geasjmator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# even-syllable intransitve verbs -a, -e. Lexicon RAVGGAT_IV, ASSTAT_IV, VIEDJET_IV, BUOLLET_IV, BOAHTET_IV


Tests:
  Verb - assjmat: # RAVGGAT_IV
    assjmat+V+IV+Inf: assjmat
    assjmat+V+IV+Sup: asjmatjit
    assjmat+V+IV+Ger: asjmadijn
    assjmat+V+IV+PrfPrc: assjmam
    assjmat+V+IV+PrsPrc: assjme
    assjmat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: assjmamin
    assjmat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: assjmamis
    assjmat+V+IV+VAbess: asjmak #Inga is a littlebit unsure about the -dak ending, maybe it's really an ending for odd-syll but is mixed up? 06.10.14 The dak ending has been removed as it is most certain a odd-syll suffix
    assjmat+V+IV+VGen: asjma
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: asjmav
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: asjma
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: assjmá
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: assjmin
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: assjmabihtte
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: assjmaba
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: assjmap
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: assjmabihtit
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: assjmi
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: assjmiv
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: assjmi
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: asjmaj
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: asjmajma
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: asjmajda
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: asjmajga
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: asjmajma
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: asjmajda
    assjmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: assjmin
    assjmat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: asjma
    assjmat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: assjmis
    assjmat+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: assjmon
    assjmat+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: assjme
    assjmat+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: assjmiska
    assjmat+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: assjmop
    assjmat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: assjmup
    assjmat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: assjmut
    assjmat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: assjmusa
    assjmat+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: asjmatjav
    assjmat+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: asjmatja
    assjmat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: asjmasj
    assjmat+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: asjmatji
    assjmat+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    assjmat+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: asjmaduvvá
    assjmat+V+IV+Cond+Sg1:  asjmaluluv
    assjmat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: asjmalulujma
    assjmat+V+IV+Cond+Pl3: asjmalulun

  Verb - gehkat: # RAVGGAT_IV
    gehkat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: gega
    gehkat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: gehkis
    gehkat+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: [gæhkon, gähkon]
    gehkat+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [gæhkke, gähkke]
    gehkat+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: gehkiska
    gehkat+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: [gæhkop, gähkop]
    gehkat+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: gehkit
    gehkat+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: gehkisa
    gehkat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: gehkup
    gehkat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: gehkut
    gehkat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: gehkusa


  Verb - gærggat: # RAVGGAT
    gærggat+V+IV+Inf: [gærggat, gärggat]
    gærggat+V+IV+Sup: gergatjit
    gærggat+V+IV+Ger: gergadijn
    gærggat+V+IV+PrfPrc: [gærggam, gärggam]
    gærggat+V+IV+PrsPrc: [gærgge, gärgge]
    gærggat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: [gærggamin, gärggamin]
    gærggat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: [gærggamis, gärggamis]
    gærggat+V+IV+VAbess: gergak
    gærggat+V+IV+VGen: gerga
    gærggat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gergav
    gærggat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gerga
    gærggat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [gærggabihtit, gärggabihtit]
    gærggat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [gærggi, gärggi]
    gærggat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [gærggiv, gärggiv]
    gærggat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [gærggi, gärggi]
    gærggat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: gergaj
    gærggat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: gergajma
    gærggat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: gergajda
    gærggat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: gergajga
    gærggat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: gerga
    gærggat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: [gærggis, gärggis]
    gærggat+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: [gærggon, gärggon]
    gærggat+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [gærgge, gärgge]
    gærggat+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: [gærggiska, gärggiska]
    gærggat+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: [gærggop, gärggop]
    gærggat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: [gærggup, gärggup]
    gærggat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: [gærggut, gärggut]
    gærggat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: [gærggusa, gärggusa]
    gærggat+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: gergatjav
    gærggat+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: gergatja
    gærggat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: gergasj
    gærggat+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: gergatji
    gærggat+V+IV+Der/Pass+V++Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    gærggat+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: gergaduvvá
    gærggat+V+IV+Cond+Sg1: gergaluluv
    gærggat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: gergalulujma
    gærggat+V+IV+Cond+Pl3: gergalulun

  Verb - goaŋŋgat: # RAVGGAT
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Inf: goaŋŋgat
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Sup: gåŋgatjit
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Ger: gåŋgadijn
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+PrfPrc: goaŋŋgam
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+PrsPrc: goaŋŋge
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: goaŋŋgamin
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: goaŋŋgamis
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+VAbess: gåŋgak
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+VGen: gåŋga
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gåŋgav
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gåŋga
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: goaŋŋgabihtit
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: goaŋŋgi
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: goaŋŋgiv
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: goaŋŋgi
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: gåŋgaj
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: gåŋgajma
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: gåŋgajda
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: gåŋgajga
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: gåŋga
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: goaŋŋgis
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: goaŋŋgon
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: goaŋŋge
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: goaŋŋgiska
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: goaŋŋgop
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: goaŋŋgup
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: goaŋŋgut
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: goaŋŋgusa
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: gåŋgatjav
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: gåŋgatja
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: gåŋgasj
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: gåŋgatji
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Der/Pass+V++Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: gåŋgaduvvá
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Cond+Sg1: gåŋgaluluv
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: gåŋgalulujma
    goaŋŋgat+V+IV+Cond+Pl3: gåŋgalulun

  Verb - doajmmat: # RAVGGAT_IV
    doajmmat+V+IV+Inf: doajmmat
    doajmmat+V+IV+Sup: dåjmatjit
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ger: dåjmadijn
    doajmmat+V+IV+PrfPrc: doajmmam
    doajmmat+V+IV+PrsPrc: doajmme
    doajmmat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: doajmmamin
    doajmmat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: doajmmamis
    doajmmat+V+IV+VAbess: dåjmak
    doajmmat+V+IV+VGen: dåjma
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: dåjmav
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: dåjma
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: doajmmá
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: doajmmin
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: doajmmabihtte
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: doajmmaba
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: doajmmap
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: doajmmabihtit
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: doajmmi
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: doajmmiv
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: doajmmi
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dåjmaj
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: dåjmajma
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: dåjmajda
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: dåjmajga
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: dåjmajma
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: dåjmajda
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: doajmmin
    doajmmat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: dåjma
    doajmmat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: doajmmis
    doajmmat+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: doajmmon
    doajmmat+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: doajmme
    doajmmat+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: doajmmiska
    doajmmat+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: doajmmop
    doajmmat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: doajmmup
    doajmmat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: doajmmut
    doajmmat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: doajmmusa
    doajmmat+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: dåjmatjav
    doajmmat+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: dåjmatja
    doajmmat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: dåjmasj
    doajmmat+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: dåjmatji
    doajmmat+V+IV+Der/Pass+V++Ind+Prs+Sg1: [] #dåjmaduvvat is possible but it must come from dåjmadit
    doajmmat+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: dåjmaduvvá
    doajmmat+V+IV+Cond+Sg1: dåjmaluluv
    doajmmat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: dåjmalulujma
    doajmmat+V+IV+Cond+Pl3: dåjmalulun

  Verb - asstat: # ASSTAT_IV
    asstat+V+IV+Inf: asstat
    asstat+V+IV+Sup: astatjit
    asstat+V+IV+Ger: astadijn
    asstat+V+IV+PrfPrc: asstam
    asstat+V+IV+PrsPrc: asste
    asstat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: asstamin
    asstat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: asstamis
    asstat+V+IV+VAbess: astak
    asstat+V+IV+VGen: asta
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: astav
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: asta
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: asstabihtit
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: assti
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: asstiv
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: assti
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: astaj
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: astajma
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: astajda
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: astajga
    asstat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: asta
    asstat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: asstis
    asstat+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: asston
    asstat+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: asste
    asstat+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: asstiska
    asstat+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: asstop
    asstat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: asstup
    asstat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: asstut
    asstat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: asstusa
    asstat+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: astatjav
    asstat+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: astatja
    asstat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: astasj
    asstat+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: astatji
    asstat+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Inf: []
    asstat+V+IV+Cond+Sg1: astaluluv
    asstat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: astalulujma
    asstat+V+IV+Cond+Pl3: astalulun

  Verb - biegget: # BUOLLET_IV
    biegget+V+IV+Inf: biegget
    biegget+V+IV+Sup: [bækkátjit, bäkkátjit]
    biegget+V+IV+Ger: biekkedijn
    biegget+V+IV+PrfPrc: [bæggám, bäggám]
    biegget+V+IV+PrsPrc: biegge
    biegget+V+IV+Actio+Ess: bieggemin
    biegget+V+IV+Actio+Ela: bieggemis
    biegget+V+IV+VAbess: biekkek
    biegget+V+IV+VGen: biekke
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [bækkáv, bäkkáv]
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [bækká, bäkká]
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: bieggebihtit
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bieggi
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: bieggiv
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: bieggi
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: biekkij
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: biekkijma
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: biekkijda
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: biekkijga
    biegget+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: biekke
    biegget+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: bieggis
    biegget+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: [bæggon, bäggon]
    biegget+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: biegge
    biegget+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: bieggiska
    biegget+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: [bæggop, bäggop]
    biegget+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: [bæggup, bäggup]
    biegget+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: [bæggut, bäggut]
    biegget+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: [bæggusa, bäggusa]
    biegget+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: biekkitjav
    biegget+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: biekkitja
    biegget+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: biekkisj
    biegget+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: biekkitji
    biegget+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    biegget+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: biekkeduvvá
    biegget+V+IV+Cond+Sg1: [bækkáluluv, bäkkáluluv]
    biegget+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: [bækkálulujma, bäkkálulujma]
    biegget+V+IV+Cond+Pl3: [bækkálulun, bäkkálulun]

  Verb - boahtet: # BOAHTET_IV
    boahtet+V+IV+Inf: boahtet
    boahtet+V+IV+Sup: boadátjit
    boahtet+V+IV+Ger: boadedijn
    boahtet+V+IV+PrfPrc: boahtám
    boahtet+V+IV+PrsPrc: boahtte
    boahtet+V+IV+Actio+Ess: boahtemin
    boahtet+V+IV+Actio+Ela: boahtemis
    boahtet+V+IV+VAbess: boadek
    boahtet+V+IV+VGen: boade
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: boadáv
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: boadá
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: boahtebihtit
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: båhti
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: båhtiv
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: båhti
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: bådij
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: bådijma
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: bådijda
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: bådijga
    boahtet+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: boade
    boahtet+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: båhtis
    boahtet+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: boahton
    boahtet+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: boahtte
    boahtet+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: båhtiska
    boahtet+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: boahtop
    boahtet+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: båhtup
    boahtet+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: båhtut
    boahtet+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: båhtusa
    boahtet+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: båditjav
    boahtet+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: båditja
    boahtet+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: bådisj
    boahtet+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: båditji
    boahtet+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Inf: []
    boahtet+V+IV+Cond+Sg1: boadáluluv
    boahtet+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: boadálulujma
    boahtet+V+IV+Cond+Pl3: boadálulun
